Oklahoma, session 2025, SB815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2011.12 of Title 12, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. In an action for forcible entry and detainer pursuant to


Section 1148.1 et seq. of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the


court entering an order that dismisses the action prior to entry of


a judgment or that enters a judgment in favor of the defendant shall


issue an order to immediately seal all records related to the case.



Req. No. 141 Page 1


2. In an action for forcible entry and detainer pursuant to


Section 1148.1 et seq. of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the


court entering a judgment in favor of the plaintiff shall issue an


order to seal all records related to the case two (2) years after


the date of the judgment.


B. Records that are sealed pursuant to this section shall be


removed from and shall not appear in any database available to the


public.


C. When the records in a forcible entry and detainer action are


sealed, the defendant’s case records shall only be available to the


following:


1. The person whose records are sealed and any part or any


attorney who has made an appearance in the case where records are


sealed;


2. The court; and


3. The court clerk or any department that is responsible for


maintenance of records.


In no event shall the defendant’s sealed case be sold or


released as part of a bulk or individual records transfer to a third


party.


D. The provisions of this section shall apply to all records


relating to an action for forcible entry and detainer that are


maintained by the court including, but not limited to, the complaint


and any other pleadings, proof of service, any findings and orders

Req. No. 141 Page 2


of the court, and all other papers, records, proceedings, and


evidence including exhibits and transcripts of testimony.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-141 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:00 AM







































Req. No. 141 Page 3